Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4619
Grant of limited contact.

On motion of a deploying parent, and in accordance with the law of this state other than the Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act, unless the court finds that the contact would be contrary to the best interest of the child, a court shall grant limited contact to a nonparent who is a family member of the child or an individual with whom the child has a close and substantial relationship.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 19.